Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Grand Jury

§§ 5601-5605.
Repealed. 1973, No. 118, § 25, eff. Oct. 1, 1973.

§ 5606.
Penalties.

A court reporter or other person taking, recording, or transcribing testimony given before a grand jury who reveals any matter or thing coming before the grand jury, except as the Supreme Court may authorize by rule, shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00 nor less than $100.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1973, No. 118, § 19, eff. Oct. 1, 1973.